Nebraska, session 109, LB811.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB811 LB811
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 18-3404, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-3404 (1) A single municipality may create a land bank if the
municipality is a city of the metropolitan class or city of the primary
class. Such municipality shall create the land bank by the adoption of an
ordinance which specifies the following:
(a) The name of the land bank;
(b) The initial individuals to serve as members of the board and the
length of terms for which they are to serve; and
(c) The qualifications and terms of office of members of the board.
(2) Two or more municipalities may elect to enter into an agreement
pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act to create a single land bank
to act on behalf of such municipalities, which agreement shall contain
the information required by subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A municipality may elect to join an existing land bank by
entering into an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act
with a municipality city of the metropolitan class or city of the primary
class that has created a land bank pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section or by joining an existing agreement pursuant to the Interlocal
Cooperation Act with the municipalities that formed a land bank pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section. Agreements entered into or joined
under this subsection shall contain the information required by
subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Each land bank created pursuant to the Nebraska Municipal Land
Bank Act shall be deemed to be a public corporation acting in a
governmental capacity and a political subdivision of the state and shall
have permanent and perpetual duration until terminated and dissolved in
accordance with section 18-3414.
(5) The primary goal of any land bank shall be to facilitate the
return of vacant, abandoned, and tax-delinquent properties to productive
use.
-2-

LB811 LB811
2026 2026
Sec. 2. Section 18-3405, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-3405 (1) If a land bank is created by a single municipality
pursuant to subsection (1) of section 18-3404, the board of such land
bank shall meet the following requirements:
(a) The board shall consist of:
(i) Seven voting members appointed by the chief executive officer of
the municipality that created the land bank and confirmed by a two-thirds
vote of the governing body of such municipality; and
(ii) The following nonvoting members:
(A) The planning director of the municipality that created the land
bank or his or her designee or, if there is no planning director, a
person designated by the governing body of the municipality that created
the land bank;
(B) One member of the governing body of the municipality that
created the land bank, appointed by such governing body; and
(C) Such other nonvoting members as are appointed by the chief
executive officer of the municipality that created the land bank and
confirmed by a two-thirds vote of the governing body of such
municipality;
(b) The seven voting members of the board shall be residents of the
municipality that created the land bank;
(c) If the governing body of the municipality creating the land bank
has any of its members elected by district or ward, then at least one
voting member of the board shall be appointed from each such district or
ward. Such voting members shall represent, to the greatest extent
possible, the racial and ethnic diversity of the municipality creating
the land bank;
(d) The seven voting members of the board shall have, collectively,
verifiable skills, expertise, and knowledge in market-rate and affordable
residential, commercial, industrial, and mixed-use real estate
-3-

LB811 LB811
2026 2026
development, financing, law, purchasing and sales, asset management,
economic and community development, and the acquisition of tax sale
certificates;
(e) The seven voting members of the board shall include:
(i) At least one member representing a chamber of commerce;
(ii) At least one member with experience in banking;
(iii) At least one member with experience in real estate
development;
(iv) At least one member with experience as a realtor;
(v) At least one member with experience in nonprofit or affordable
housing; and
(vi) At least one member with experience in large-scale residential
or commercial property rental; and
(f) A single voting member may satisfy more than one of the
requirements provided in subdivision (1)(e) of this section if he or she
has the required qualifications. It is not necessary that there be a
different member to fulfill each such requirement.
(2) If a land bank is created by more than one municipality pursuant
to an agreement under the Interlocal Cooperation Act as described in
subsection (2) or (3) of section 18-3404, the board of such land bank
shall meet the following requirements:
(a) The board shall consist of:
(i) An odd number of voting members, totaling at least seven,
appointed by the chief executive officers of the municipalities that
created the land bank, as mutually agreed to by such chief executive
officers, and confirmed by a two-thirds vote of the governing body of
each municipality that created the land bank; and
(ii) The following nonvoting members:
(A) The planning director of each municipality that created the land
bank or his or her designee or, if there is no planning director for any
municipality that created the land bank, a person designated by the
-4-

LB811 LB811
2026 2026
governing body of such municipality;
(B) One member of the governing body of each municipality that
created the land bank, appointed by the governing body on which such
member serves; and
(C) Such other nonvoting members as are appointed by the chief
executive officers of the municipalities that created the land bank, as
mutually agreed to by such chief executive officers, and confirmed by a
two-thirds vote of the governing body of each municipality that created
the land bank;
(b) Each voting member of the board shall be a resident of one of
the municipalities that created the land bank. If a land bank is created
by a city of the metropolitan class or a city of the primary class, at
least one voting member of the board shall be appointed from each of the
municipalities that created the land bank;
(c) The voting members of the board shall have, collectively,
verifiable skills, expertise, and knowledge in market-rate and affordable
residential, commercial, industrial, and mixed-use real estate
development, financing, law, purchasing and sales, asset management,
economic and community development, and the acquisition of tax sale
certificates;
(d) The voting members of the board shall include:
(i) At least one member representing a chamber of commerce;
(ii) At least one member with experience in banking;
(iii) At least one member with experience in real estate
development;
(iv) At least one member with experience as a realtor;
(v) At least one member with experience in nonprofit or affordable
housing; and
(vi) At least one member with experience in large-scale residential
or commercial property rental; and
(e) A single voting member may satisfy more than one of the
-5-

LB811 LB811
2026 2026
requirements provided in subdivision (2)(d) of this section if he or she
has the required qualifications. It is not necessary that there be a
different member to fulfill each such requirement.
(3) The members of the board shall select annually from among
themselves a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, a treasurer, and such other
officers as the board may determine.
(4) A public official or public employee shall be eligible to be a
member of the board.
(5) A vacancy on the board among the appointed board members shall
be filled not later than six months after the date of such vacancy in the
same manner as the original appointment.
(6) Board members shall serve without compensation.
(7) The board shall meet in regular session according to a schedule
adopted by the board and shall also meet in special session as convened
by the chairperson or upon written notice signed by a majority of the
voting members. The presence of a majority of the voting members of the
board shall constitute a quorum.
(8) Except as otherwise provided in this section and in sections
18-3410, 18-3417, and 18-3418, all actions of the board shall be approved
by the affirmative vote of a majority of the voting members present and
voting.
(9) Any action of the board on the following matters shall be
approved by a majority of the voting members:
(a) Adoption of bylaws and other rules and regulations for conduct
of the land bank's business;
(b) Hiring or firing of any employee or contractor of the land bank.
This function may, by majority vote of the voting members, be delegated
by the board to a specified officer or committee of the land bank, under
such terms and conditions, and to the extent, that the board may specify;
(c) The incurring of debt;
(d) Adoption or amendment of the annual budget; and
-6-

LB811 LB811
2026 2026
(e) Sale, lease, encumbrance, or alienation of real property,
improvements, or personal property with a value of more than fifty
thousand dollars.
(10) Members of a board shall not be liable personally on the bonds
or other obligations of the land bank, and the rights of creditors shall
be solely against such land bank.
(11) The board of a land bank created by a city of the metropolitan
class that borders a county in which at least three cities of the first
class are located shall adopt policies and procedures to specify the
conditions that must be met in order for such land bank to give an
automatically accepted bid as authorized in sections 18-3417 and 18-3418.
The adoption of such policies and procedures shall require the approval
of two-thirds of the voting members of the board. At a minimum, such
policies and procedures shall ensure that the automatically accepted bid
shall only be given for one of the following reasons:
(a) The real property substantially meets more than one of the
following criteria as determined by two-thirds of the voting members of
the board:
(i) The property is not occupied by the owner or any lessee or
licensee of the owner;
(ii) There are no utilities currently being provided to the
property;
(iii) Any buildings on the property have been deemed unfit for human
habitation, occupancy, or use by local housing officials;
(iv) Any buildings on the property are exposed to the elements such
that deterioration of the building is occurring;
(v) Any buildings on the property are boarded up;
(vi) There have been previous efforts to rehabilitate any buildings
on the property;
(vii) There is a presence of vermin, uncut vegetation, or debris
accumulation on the property;
-7-

LB811 LB811
2026 2026
(viii) There have been past actions by the municipality to maintain
the grounds or any building on the property; or
(ix) The property has been out of compliance with orders of local
housing officials;
(b) The real property is contiguous to a parcel that meets more than
one of the criteria in subdivision (11)(a) of this section or that is
already owned by the land bank; or
(c) Acquisition of the real property by the land bank would serve
the best interests of the community as determined by two-thirds of the
voting members of the board. In determining whether the acquisition would
serve the best interests of the community, the board shall take into
consideration the hierarchical ranking of priorities for the use of real
property conveyed by a land bank established pursuant to subsection (5)
of section 18-3410, if any such hierarchical ranking is established.
(12)(a) A member of the board may be removed for neglect of duty,
misconduct in office, conviction of any felony, or other good cause as
follows:
(i) In the case of a land bank created pursuant to subsection (1) of
section 18-3404, a board member may be removed by the chief executive
officer of the municipality that created the land bank after such removal
has been approved by a two-thirds vote of the governing body of such
municipality; or
(ii) In the case of a land bank created pursuant to subsection (2)
or (3) of section 18-3404, a board member may be removed by the chief
executive officer of the municipality where the member resides after such
removal has been approved by a two-thirds vote of the governing body of
such municipality.
(b) Such chief executive officer shall send a notice of removal to
such board member, which notice shall set forth the charges against him
or her. The member shall be deemed removed from office unless within ten
days from the receipt of such notice he or she files a request for a
-8-

LB811 LB811
2026 2026
hearing. Such request shall be filed with:
(i) In the case of a land bank created pursuant to subsection (1) of
section 18-3404, the city clerk or village clerk of the municipality city
that created the land bank; or
(ii) In the case of a land bank created pursuant to subsection (2)
or (3) of section 18-3404, the city clerk or village clerk of the
municipality where the member resides.
(c) If a request for hearing is so filed, the governing body of the
municipality receiving the request shall hold a hearing not sooner than
ten days after the date a hearing is requested, at which hearing the
board member shall have the right to appear in person or by counsel and
the governing body shall determine whether the removal shall be upheld.
If the removal is not upheld by the governing body, the board member
shall continue to hold his or her office.
Sec. 3. Original sections 18-3404 and 18-3405, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-9-